Wyoming, session 2026, SF0086.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-7-301 through 9-7-307 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 3
WYOMING PROPERTY TAX RELIEF AUTHORITY
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470

9-7-301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Authority" means the Wyoming property tax
relief authority;

(ii) "Board" means the board of the Wyoming
property tax relief authority;

(iii) "Bonds" means notes, warrants, bonds,
temporary bonds and anticipation notes issued by the
authority under this article;

(iv) "Financial institution" means a bank,
savings and loan association, federal chartered credit
union, state chartered credit union or mortgage lender;

(v) "Homeowner" means a person who is a resident
of Wyoming and who owns a home in Wyoming that serves as
the person's primary residence;

SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
(vi) "Mortgage lender" means as defined by W.S.
9-7-103(a)(ix).

9-7-302. Wyoming property tax relief authority;
creation; composition.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2026, there is created the
Wyoming property tax relief authority, which is a body
politic and corporate operating as an instrumentality of
the state of Wyoming, with authority to adopt an official
seal and to sue and be sued.

(b) The authority shall be governed by a board
composed of five (5) voting members appointed by the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. Except
as provided in this subsection, all voting members shall be
appointed for four (4) year terms. The governor shall
appoint three (3) initial voting board members to a term of
four (4) years and shall appoint the remaining two (2)
initial voting board members to a term of two (2) years.
The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.
9-1-202. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the
governor in accordance with W.S. 28-12-101. The members
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
shall elect from the membership a chairman and
vice-chairman. All persons appointed and serving as members
of the board shall be qualified voters of the state of
Wyoming.

(c) Members of the board may receive the same per
diem, expenses and travel allowance as members of the
legislature under W.S. 28-5-101 while in attendance at
meetings of the board and while performing their duties as
members of the board.

(d) The board may appoint an executive director of
the authority, who serves as the executive secretary of the
board and is the chief executive officer of the authority.
The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the
board. The executive director shall be an ex officio member
of the board but shall not vote.

(e) Any agency, board, commission, department or
institution of the state and the governing authorities of
political subdivisions may make surveys, reports and
investigations, and may furnish records and information and
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
provide other assistance and advice as the authority may
require.

(f) The authority is subject to the requirements of:

(i) W.S. 16-3-101 through 16-3-105;

(ii) W.S. 16-4-201 through 16-4-205, except as
provided in subsection (g) of this section;

(iii) W.S. 16-4-401 through 16-4-408.

(g) Any applications or records submitted by
applicants or participants in the property tax loan program
established under W.S. 9-7-307 shall be confidential and
shall not be available for disclosure or inspection under
the Public Records Act.

9-7-303. Purposes; budget.

(a) The authority is created to facilitate and
provide loans for Wyoming homeowners in need of assistance
with paying increased property taxes.
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470

(b) The authority may borrow funds for the execution
of the purposes of the authority as provided in W.S.
9-7-305.

(c) The authority shall not exercise the rights or
powers granted to it in this section if private persons,
firms or corporations are performing the acts or are
providing the services authorized for the authority.

(d) The authority shall submit its budget for review
as provided by W.S. 9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014. Any
appropriation to the authority shall be expended only for
administrative purposes.

9-7-304. Powers of the authority.

(a) The authority may:

(i) Employ officers, agents and employees as it
deems necessary for the performance of its duties and
prescribe the powers and duties and fix the compensation of
the officers, agents and employees;
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470

(ii) Contract, upon terms as it may agree upon,
for legal, financial and other professional services
necessary or expedient in the conduct of its affairs;

(iii) Utilize the services of executive agencies
of the state upon mutually agreeable terms and conditions;

(iv) Receive by gift, grant, donation or
otherwise, any sum of money, aid or assistance from the
United States, the state of Wyoming, any political
subdivision or any other public or private entity or any
country in good standing with the United States subject to
state and federal law;

(v) Administer and manage the property tax loan
program established in W.S. 9-7-307. The authority may
promulgate any rules necessary to administer and manage the
program;

(vi) Do any and all things necessary or proper
for the development, regulation and accomplishment of the
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
purposes of the authority within the limitations of
authority granted by this article.

9-7-305. Bonds.

(a) In addition to the powers otherwise granted to
the authority and in order to accomplish its purposes,
including the provision of funding for the property tax
loan program under W.S. 9-7-307, the authority shall have
the power to borrow money and evidence the borrowing in the
issuance and sale of bonds or other obligations of the
authority, the principal and interest of which shall be
payable solely out of revenues authorized to be dedicated
and pledged for the payment.

(b) Bonds issued under this section shall be solely
the obligation of the authority and shall recite on their
face that they do not constitute obligations of the state
of Wyoming or any county, municipality or other political
subdivision of the state. The bonds or other obligations
shall be authorized and issued by resolution of the
authority. The bonds shall be executed in the form and
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
manner provided by the resolution authorizing their
issuance. The resolution shall include:

(i) The series of the bond or obligation;

(ii) The date of issuance of the bond or
obligation;

(iii) The date of maturity of the bond or
obligation;

(iv) That the bond or obligation shall bear
interest, and the interest rate;

(v) The form that the bond or obligation shall
be in;

(vi) The registration and exchangeability
privileges of the bond or obligation;

(vii) The medium of payment and the place of
payment of the bond or obligation;

SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
(viii) The terms of redemption and that the bond
or obligation shall be subject to those terms;

(ix) That the bond or obligation shall be
entitled only to a priority on the revenues of the
authority as the authority's resolution provides, subject
to subsection (d) of this section.

(c) The bonds or other obligations issued under this
section may be sold by the authority:

(i) At, above or below par value;

(ii) At public or private sale;

(iii) In a manner and from time to time as the
authority determines.

(d) Any bonds issued under this section shall only be
payable from and be secured by the pledge of the revenues
collected from loans issued under the property tax loan
program, subject only to prior payment of any reasonable
fees to financial institutions assisting in the
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
administration of the property tax loan program. Any holder
of the bonds may, by appropriate legal action, compel
performance of all duties required of the authority in
order to enforce payment of the bonds when due. If any bond
issued under this section is permitted to go into default
as to principal or interest, any court of competent
jurisdiction may, pursuant to the application of the holder
of the bonds, appoint a receiver who shall operate the
property tax loan program and collect and distribute the
revenues thereof pursuant to the provisions and
requirements of the resolution authorizing the bonds.

(e) If more than one (1) series of bonds is issued
payable from the revenues of the bond proceeds, the
priority of any lien on the revenues shall be as provided
by the resolution authorizing the bonds.

(f) All bonds issued under the provisions of this
section shall constitute negotiable instruments within the
meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code. The bonds and
earnings from the bonds shall be exempt from all taxation
within the state of Wyoming.

SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
(g) Any resolution of the authority authorizing the
issuance of bonds shall be published once in a newspaper of
general circulation published in Wyoming, and in a
newspaper in the area where the provision of loans under
this article are contemplated. For a period of thirty (30)
days from the date of the publication, any person in
interest may contest the legality of the resolution and of
the bonds to be issued under the resolution and the
provisions securing the bonds, including the validity of
any loan proceeds pledged to the payment thereof. After the
expiration of thirty (30) days from the date of the
publication, no person shall have any right of action to
contest the validity of the bonds, the validity of the
security pledged to the payment thereof or the provisions
of the resolution under which the bonds were issued, and
all the bonds and all related proceedings shall be
conclusively presumed to be legal.

(h) The authority may authorize the issuance of bonds
for the purpose of refunding, extending and unifying the
whole or any part of the principal, interest and redemption
premiums on any outstanding bonds issued under this
article. The refunding bonds may either be sold and the
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
proceeds applied to or deposited in escrow for the
retirement of the outstanding bonds, or may be delivered in
exchange for the outstanding bonds. The refunding bonds
shall be authorized in all respects as original bonds are
herein required or were required at the time of their
issuance to be authorized. The authority, in authorizing
the refunding bonds, shall provide for the security of the
bonds, the sources from which the bonds are to be paid and
for the rights of the holders thereof in all respects as
herein provided for other bonds issued under this article.
The board may also provide that the refunding bonds shall
have the same or different priority of lien on the revenues
pledged for their payment as was enjoyed by the bonds
refunded.

9-7-306. Use of net revenues; legal investments;
exemptions from taxation; state pledge not to impair
bondholder's rights and remedies.

(a) The authority may use and employ any net revenues
derived from the property tax loan program and any bonds
issued under this article and from any other source, after
making the required principal and interest payments on any
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
revenue bonds issued under this article and any other
payments required by this article and any other payments
provided in any resolution authorizing the issuance and
sale of revenue bonds and obligations, for the property tax
loan program established in W.S. 9-7-307.

(b) If the authority determines that no need for
additional funding for the property tax loan program
established by W.S. 9-7-307 exists and after the
administrative expenses of the authority are paid, net
revenues derived under this article shall be paid to the
state treasurer for credit to the general fund.

(c) The bonds of the authority are legal investments
that may be used as collateral for public funds of the
state, insurance companies, banks, savings and loan
associations, investment companies, trustees and other
fiduciaries that may properly and legally invest funds in
their control or belonging to them in bonds of the
authority.

(d) The exercise of the powers granted by this
article constitutes the performance of an essential
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
governmental function. Any bonds issued under this article
and the earnings from the bonds shall be free from taxation
of every kind by the state, municipalities and political
subdivisions of the state.

(e) The state pledges to the holders of any bonds
issued under this article that the state will not limit or
alter the rights vested in the authority to fulfill the
terms of agreements made with the holders, or in any way
impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the
bonds together with the interest, with interest on any
unpaid installments of interest and all costs and expenses
in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf
of the holders are fully met and discharged. The authority
is authorized to include this pledge of the state in any
agreement with the holders of the bonds.

9-7-307. Property tax loan program; requirements;
authority duties.

(a) The property tax loan program is hereby created.
The authority shall manage the program in accordance with
the following:
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470

(i) The authority shall use funds collected from
the issuance of bonds and any gifts, grants and other funds
received in accordance with this article to provide loans
to homeowners who require assistance with paying property
taxes as a result of an increase in the amount of property
tax owed by the homeowner on the homeowner's primary
residence;

(ii) Any homeowner seeking a loan under the
program shall submit an application on a form provided by
the authority. Application may be made to the authority or
to a financial institution participating in the loan
program under this section;

(iii) Loans issued to a homeowner under this
section shall not exceed an amount equal to the increase in
property tax on the homeowner's primary residence for the
current tax year compared to the immediately preceding tax
year;

(iv) The interest charged on each loan issued
under this article shall be the current equivalent yield of
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
a United States treasury security of the same duration of
the loan;

(v) The authority may authorize an applicant to
receive subsequent loans as a line of credit, provided
that:

(A) The amount of any credit extended or
funds distributed under this paragraph shall not exceed an
amount equal to the increase in property tax on the
homeowner's primary residence for the applicable tax year
compared to the immediately preceding tax year;

(B) A line of credit issued to an applicant
shall be in effect for and shall have an interest rate
equal to the rate specified in paragraph (iv) of this
subsection and shall have a repayment term of not more than
ten (10) years. An applicant seeking future loans,
additional time to repay a loan or a line of credit shall
reapply as required by the authority;

(C) An applicant seeking to utilize a line
of credit shall provide an annual certification to the
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
authority showing the applicant's need for a property tax
loan.

(vi) Loan proceeds disbursed under this section
shall be disbursed directly to the recipient to be used
only for the loan recipient's property taxes due on the
recipient's primary residence. The recipient shall use the
loan proceeds to pay property taxes not later than the
deadlines specified under W.S. 39-13-108(b)(i);

(vii) Upon the issuance of a loan under this
article, there shall be a lien upon the property for which
the loan for property taxes was issued. The lien shall be
paramount and superior to any other lien or encumbrance
created after a lien is created under this paragraph;

(viii) Loans shall be repaid under a payment
plan prescribed by the authority, provided that no
repayment period shall exceed ten (10) years.

(b) The authority shall authorize financial
institutions to participate in the property tax loan
program under this article. Each financial institution
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
seeking to participate shall apply to the authority on a
form prescribed by the authority. The authority may
disburse loan proceeds directly to a financial institution
for disbursement in accordance with this section. A
financial institution participating in the property tax
loan program shall be entitled to receive a fee not to
exceed one percent (1%) of the proceeds of each property
tax loan program loan disbursed through the financial
institution.

(c) The authority and each financial institution
participating in the property tax loan program shall
advertise the property tax loan program in a form that, in
the discretion of the authority, is likely to attract the
attention of Wyoming residents.

Section 2. W.S. 39-13-103(b)(viii) is amended to
read:

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
(viii) Every assessment schedule sent to a
taxpayer shall contain the property's estimated fair market
value for the current and previous year, or, productive
value in the case of agricultural property. The schedule
shall also contain the assessment ratio as provided by
paragraph (b)(iii) of this section for the taxable
property, the amount of taxes assessed on the taxable
property from the previous year, an estimate of the taxes
which will be due and payable for the current year based on
the previous year's mill levies and, if the property is a
single family residential structure, an estimate of the
taxes that will be avoided if the property is eligible for
the exemptions under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xliii) and (xliv).
Each assessment schedule issued under this paragraph shall
contain information, including contact information, of any
property tax relief program authorized by state law. The
schedule shall contain a statement of the process to
contest assessments as prescribed by W.S. 39-13-109(b)(i);

Section 3. There is appropriated one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming
property tax relief authority created by section 1 of this
act to be expended only for purposes of administrative
SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
expenses of the Wyoming property tax relief authority. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2028.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028.

Section 4. The governor shall make initial
appointments to the Wyoming property tax relief authority
by making temporary appointments under W.S. 28-12-101(b),
subject to W.S. 28-12-101 through 28-12-103.

Section 5. After members are appointed under section
4 of this act, the Wyoming property tax relief authority
board may take any action necessary to establish and to
prepare to implement the property tax loan program,
provided that no loan under the program shall be created,
issued or disbursed before July 1, 2026.

SF0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0470
Section 6.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective July
1, 2026.

(END)
SF0086